Utah statutes.
48-3a-1109.   Member or manager of a professional services company.

A professional services company organized to provide a professional service:

(1)  may include a member, manager, or employee who is authorized under the laws of the jurisdiction where the member, manager, or employee resides to provide a similar professional service;

(2)  may include a member who is not licensed or registered by the state to provide the professional service to the extent allowed by the applicable licensing or registration act relating to the professional service; and

(3)  may render a professional service in this state only through a member, manager, or employee who is licensed or registered by this state to render the professional service.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

